District of Columbia statutes.
47-1038

American Veterans of World War II; lot 805, square 160.

The property situated in square 160 in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, described as lot 805, owned, occupied, and used by the AMVETS, American Veterans of World War II, is hereby exempt from all taxation so long as the same is so owned and occupied, and not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.

History

June 28, 1952, 66 Stat. 285, ch. 484, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1038.
1973 Ed., § 47-831.